North Carolina, session 2025, HB167.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 35 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-269.9. Firearms in unattended motor vehicles.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term "firearm" is as defined in
G.S. 14-408.1.
(b) Prohibition. – It is unlawful to leave a firearm in an unattended motor vehicle unless
the vehicle is locked and the firearm is either (i) secured with a trigger lock or other safety device
designed to prevent an unauthorized user from operating the firearm or (ii) in a locked container.
(c) Penalty. – Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a Class
2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H167-v-1*